Louisiana, session 2026, HB1230.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Section 2 of this Act amends and reenacts Chapter 13 of Title 6 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 in its entirety. Due to the length of the Chapter, present
law is not included as overstruck text.
Page 1 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
Section 2. Chapter 13 of Title 6 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 6:1031 through 1072, is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 13: THE LOUISIANA MONEY TRANSMISSION ACT
§1031. Short title
This Chapter shall be known as and may be cited as the "Louisiana Money
Transmission Act."
§1032. Purpose
This Chapter is designed to replace the "Sale of Checks and Money
Transmission Act" codified at Title 6, Chapter 13, R.S. 6:1031 et seq. It is the intent
of the Legislature that the provisions of this Chapter accomplish all of the following:
(1) Ensure states can coordinate in all areas of regulation, licensing, and
supervision to eliminate unnecessary regulatory burden and more effectively utilize
regulatory resources.
(2) Protect the Louisiana public from financial crime.
(3) Standardize the types of activities that are subject to licensing or
otherwise exempt from licensing.
(4) Modernize the licensure, supervision, and regulation of multistate money
transmission licenses with current safety and soundness requirements to ensure
customer funds are protected in an environment that supports innovative and
competitive business practices.
§1033. Definitions
For purposes of this Chapter, the following definitions have the following
meanings:
(1) "Acting in concert" means persons knowingly acting together with a
common goal of jointly acquiring control of a licensee whether or not pursuant to an
express agreement.
(2) "Authorized agent" means a person that a licensee designates to engage
in money transmission on behalf of the licensee.
(3) "Average daily money transmission liability" means the amount of the
licensee's outstanding money transmission obligations in this state at the end of each
Page 2 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
day in a given period of time, added together and divided by the total number of days
in the given period of time. For purposes of calculating average daily money
transmission liability pursuant to this Chapter for any licensee required to do so, the
given period of time shall be the quarters ending March thirty-first, June thirtieth,
September thirtieth, and December thirty-first.
(4) "Bank Secrecy Act" means the Bank Secrecy Act, 31 U.S.C. 5311 et
seq., and its implementing regulations, as amended and recodified from time to time.
(5) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the office of financial
institutions.
(6) "Closed loop stored value" means stored value that is redeemable by the
issuer only for goods or services provided by the issuer or its affiliate or franchisees
of the issuer or its affiliate, except to the extent required by applicable law to be
redeemable in cash for its cash value.
(7)(a) "Control" means satisfying one of the following:
(i) The power to vote, directly or indirectly, at least twenty-five percent of
the outstanding voting shares or voting interests of a licensee or person in control of
a licensee.
(ii) The power to elect or appoint a majority of key individuals or executive
officers, managers, directors, trustees, or other persons exercising managerial
authority of a person in control of a licensee.
(iii) The power to exercise, directly or indirectly, a controlling influence over
the management or policies of a licensee or person in control of a licensee.
(iv) Any other set of facts and circumstances, as determined by the
commissioner in his discretion, that may constitute control.
(b) For purposes of determining the percentage of a person controlled by any
other person, the person's interest shall be aggregated with the interest of any other
immediate family member, including the person's spouse, parents, children, siblings,
mothers-in-law and fathers-in-law, sons-in-law and daughters-in-law, brothers-in-law
and sisters-in-law, and any other person who shares the person's home.
Page 3 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(8) "Eligible rating" means a credit rating of any of the three highest rating
categories provided by an eligible rating service, whereby each category may include
rating category modifiers such as "plus" or "minus" for Standard & Poors, or the
equivalent for any other eligible rating service. Long-term credit ratings are deemed
eligible if the rating is equal to A- or higher by Standard & Poors, or the equivalent
from any other eligible rating service. Short-term credit ratings are deemed eligible
if the rating is equal to or higher than A-2 or SP-2 by Standard & Poors, or the
equivalent from any other eligible rating service. In the event that ratings differ
among eligible rating services, the highest rating shall apply when determining
whether a security bears an eligible rating.
(9) "Eligible rating service" means any Nationally Recognized Statistical
Rating Organization as defined by the United States Securities and Exchange
Commission, and any other organization designated by the commissioner by rule,
regulation, or order.
(10) "Federally insured depository financial institution" means a bank, credit
union, savings and loan association, trust company, savings association, savings
bank, industrial bank, or industrial loan company organized pursuant to the laws of
the United States or any state of the United States, if the bank, credit union, savings
and loan association, trust company, savings association, savings bank, industrial
bank, or industrial loan company has federally insured deposits.
(11) "In this state" means at a physical location within Louisiana for a
transaction requested in person. For a transaction requested electronically or by
phone, the provider of a money transmission may determine if the person requesting
the transaction is "in this state" by relying on other information provided by the
person regarding the location of the individual's residential address or a business
entity's principal place of business or other physical address location, and any
records associated with the person that the provider of money transmission may have
that indicate such location, including but not limited to an address associated with
an account.
(12) "Individual" means a natural person.
Page 4 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(13) "Key individual" means any individual ultimately responsible for
establishing or directing policies and procedures of the licensee, such as an executive
officer, manager, director, or trustee.
(14) "Licensee" means a person licensed by the office pursuant to this
Chapter.
(15) "Material litigation" means litigation, that according to United States
generally accepted accounting principles, is significant to a person's financial health
and would be required to be disclosed in the person's annual audited financial
statements, report to shareholders, or similar records.
(16) "Money" means a medium of exchange that is authorized or adopted by
the United States or a foreign government. The term includes a monetary unit of
account established by an intergovernmental organization or by agreement between
two or more governments.
(17) "Monetary value" means a medium of exchange, whether or not
redeemable in money.
(18) "Money transmission" means any of the following:
(a) Selling or issuing payment instruments to a person located in this state.
(b) Selling or issuing stored value to a person located in this state.
(c) Receiving money or monetary value for transmission from a person
located in this state.
(19) "MSB-accredited state" means a state agency that is accredited by the
Conference of State Bank Supervisors and Money Transmitter Regulators
Association for money transmission licensing and supervision.
(20) "Multistate licensing process" means any agreement entered into by and
among state regulators relating to coordinated processing of applications for money
transmission licenses, applications for the acquisition of control of a licensee, control
determinations, or notice and information requirements for a change of key
individuals.
(21) "NMLS" means the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and
Registry developed by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American
Page 5 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators and owned and operated by the
State Regulatory Registry, LLC, or any successor or affiliated entity, for the
licensing and registration of persons in financial services industries.
(22) "Office" means the office of financial institutions.
(23)(a) "Outstanding money transmission obligations" shall be established
and extinguished in accordance with applicable state law and means one of the
following:
(i) Any payment instrument or stored value issued or sold by the licensee to
a person located in the United States or reported as sold by an authorized agent of the
licensee to a person who is located in the United States that has not yet been paid or
refunded by or for the licensee, or escheated in accordance with applicable
abandoned property laws.
(ii) Any money received for transmission by the licensee or an authorized
agent in the United States from a person located in the United States that has not
been received by the payee or refunded to the sender, or escheated in accordance
with applicable abandoned property laws.
(b) For purposes of this Paragraph, "in the United States" shall include, to
the extent applicable, a person in any state, territory, or possession of the United
States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a United
States military installation that is located in a foreign country.
(24) "Passive investor" means a person who is all of the following:
(a) Does not have the power to elect a majority of key individuals or
executive officers, managers, directors, trustees, or other persons exercising
managerial authority of a person in control of a licensee.
(b) Is not employed by and does not have any managerial duties of the
licensee or person in control of a licensee.
(c) Does not have the power to exercise, directly or indirectly, a controlling
influence over the management or policies of a licensee or person in control of a
licensee.
Page 6 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(d) Either attests to Subparagraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this Paragraph, in a
form and in a medium prescribed by the commissioner, or commits to the passivity
characteristics of Subparagraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this Paragraph in a written
document.
(25) "Payment instrument" means a written or electronic check, draft, money
order, traveler's check, or other written or electronic instrument for the transmission
or payment of money or monetary value, whether or not negotiable. "Payment
instrument" does not include stored value or any instrument that is either of the
following:
(a) Is redeemable by the issuer only for goods or services provided by the
issuer or its affiliate or franchisees of the issuer or its affiliate, except to the extent
required by applicable law to be redeemable in cash for its cash value.
(b) Is not sold to the public but issued and distributed as part of a loyalty,
rewards, or promotional program.
(26) "Payroll processing service provider" means a person receiving money
for transmission, on its own behalf, on behalf of its affiliate, or pursuant to a contract
with a person to deliver wages or salaries, make payment of payroll taxes to state and
federal agencies, make payments relating to employee benefit plans, or make
distributions of other authorized deductions from wages or salaries.
(27)(a) "Person" means an individual, general partnership, limited
partnership, limited liability company, corporation, trust, association, joint stock
corporation, or other legal entity, or any individual or group of individuals, however
organized.
(b) "Person" does not include a public corporation, government, or
governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.
(28) "Receipt" means a paper receipt, electronic record, or other written
confirmation.
(29) "Receiving money for transmission" or "money received for
transmission" means receiving money or monetary value in the United States for
transmission within or outside the United States by electronic or other means.
Page 7 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(30)(a) "Resident" means any of the following:
(i) A person who is domiciled in this state.
(ii) A person who is physically located in this state for more than one
hundred eighty-three calendar days of the previous three hundred sixty-five calendar
days.
(iii) A person who has a place of business in this state.
(b) "Resident" includes a legal representative of a person who meets one of
the criteria provided for in Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph.
(31)(a) "Stored value" means monetary value representing a claim against
the issuer evidenced by an electronic or digital record, and that is intended and
accepted for use as a means of redemption for money or monetary value, or payment
for goods or services. "Stored value" includes but is not limited to "prepaid access"
as defined by 31 CFR 1010.100, as amended or recodified from time to time.
(b) Notwithstanding Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph, "stored value" does
not include a payment instrument or closed loop stored value, or stored value not
sold to the public but issued and distributed as part of a loyalty, rewards, or
promotional program.
(32) "Tangible net worth", for purposes of calculating the value thereof,
means all business assets minus liabilities and intangible assets, including goodwill
and other intangible assets. For the purposes of this Paragraph, an intangible asset
may include but is not limited to favorable leasehold rights, trademarks, trade names,
internet domain names, and noncompete agreements.
§1034. Exemptions
This Chapter does not apply to:
(1) An operator of a payment system to the extent that it provides processing,
clearing, or settlement services, between or among persons exempted by this Section
or licensees, in connection with wire transfers, credit card transactions, debit card
transactions, stored value transactions, automated clearing house transfers, or similar
funds transfers.
Page 8 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(2) A person appointed as an agent of a payee to collect and process a
payment from a payor to the payee for goods or services, other than money
transmission itself, provided to the payor by the payee, provided that all of the
following apply:
(a) There exists a written agreement between the payee and the agent
directing the agent to collect and process payments from payors on the payee's
behalf.
(b) The payee holds the agent out to the public as accepting payments for
goods or services on the payee's behalf.
(c) Payment for the goods and services is treated as received by the payee
upon receipt by the agent so that the payor's obligation is extinguished and there is
no risk of loss to the payor if the agent fails to remit the funds to the payee.
(3) A person who acts as an intermediary by processing payments between
an entity that has directly incurred an outstanding money transmission obligation to
a sender, and the sender's designated recipient, provided that the entity meets all of
the following qualifications:
(a) Is properly licensed or exempt from licensing requirements of this
Chapter.
(b) Provides a receipt, electronic record, or other written confirmation to the
sender identifying the entity as the provider of money transmission in the transaction.
(c) Bears sole responsibility to satisfy the outstanding money transmission
obligation to the sender, including the obligation to make the sender whole in
connection with any failure to transmit the funds to the sender's designated recipient.
(4) The United States or a department, agency, or instrumentality thereof, or
its agent.
(5) Money transmission by the United States Postal Service or by an agent
of the United States Postal Service.
(6) A state, county, parish, city, or any other governmental agency or
governmental subdivision or instrumentality of a state, or its agent.
Page 9 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(7) A federally insured depository financial institution, a wholly owned
subsidiary of a federally insured depository institution, bank holding company, office
of an international banking corporation, foreign bank that establishes a federal
branch pursuant to the International Bank Act, 12 U.S.C. 3102, as amended or
recodified from time to time, corporation organized pursuant to the Bank Service
Company Act, 12 U.S.C. 1861 through 1867, as amended or recodified from time to
time, or corporation organized in accordance with the Edge Act, 12 U.S.C. 611
through 633, as amended or recodified from time to time.
(8) Electronic funds transfer of governmental benefits for a federal, state,
county, parish, or governmental agency by a contractor on behalf of the United
States or a department, agency, or instrumentality thereof, or on behalf of a state or
governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality thereof.
(9) A board of trade designated as a contract market pursuant to the federal
Commodity Exchange Act, 7 U.S.C. 1 through 25, both inclusive, as amended or
recodified from time to time, or a person who, in the ordinary course of business,
provides clearance and settlement services for a board of trade to the extent of its
operation as or for such a board.
(10) A registered futures commission merchant pursuant to the federal
commodities laws to the extent of its operation as such a merchant.
(11) A person registered as a securities broker-dealer pursuant to federal or
state securities laws to the extent of its operation as such a broker-dealer.
(12) An individual employed by a licensee, authorized agent, or any person
exempted from the licensing requirements of this Chapter when acting within the
scope of employment and under the supervision of the licensee, authorized agent, or
exempted person as an employee and not as an independent contractor.
(13) A person expressly appointed as a third-party service provider to or
agent of an entity exempted in accordance with Paragraph (7) of this Section, solely
to the extent that both of the following occur:
Page 10 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(a) The service provider or agent is engaging in money transmission on
behalf of and pursuant to a written agreement with the exempt entity that sets forth
the specific functions that the service provider or agent is to perform.
(b) The exempt entity assumes all risk of loss and all legal responsibility for
satisfying the outstanding money transmission obligations owed to purchasers and
holders of the outstanding money transmission obligations upon receipt of the
purchaser's or holder's money or monetary value by the service provider or agent.
(14) A person exempt by regulation or order if the commissioner finds such
exemption to be in the public interest and that the regulation of such person is not
necessary for the purposes of this Chapter.
(15) A payroll processing service provider.
(16) A licensed lender using stored value cards, debit cards, or electronic
cash for loan disbursement pursuant to the Louisiana Consumer Credit Law.
§1035. Authority to require demonstration of exemption
The commissioner may require that any person claiming to be exempt from
licensing pursuant to R.S. 6:1034 to provide information and documentation to the
office demonstrating that he qualifies for any claimed exemption.
§1036. Implementation
A. In addition to any other powers the commissioner may be authorized to
exercise pursuant to this Title, the commissioner may adopt and implement
emergency rules as the commissioner considers necessary and appropriate to prevent
or terminate any condition the commissioner reasonably considers to create an
emergency relative to a particular licensee or to licenses in general, including but not
limited to suspending the issuance or renewal of a license or suspending some or all
money transmission activities in this state.
B. In order to carry out the purposes of this Chapter, the commissioner may,
subject to the provisions of R.S. 6:1037, do all of the following:
(1) Enter into agreements or relationships with other government officials
or federal and state regulatory agencies and regulatory associations in order to
Page 11 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
improve efficiencies and reduce regulatory burden by standardizing methods or
procedures, and sharing resources, records, or related information.
(2) Use, hire, contract, or employ analytical systems, methods, or software
to examine or investigate any person as defined in R.S. 6:1033(27).
(3) Accept, from other state or federal government agencies or officials,
licensing, examination, or investigation reports made by the other state or federal
government agencies or officials.
(4) Accept audit reports made by an independent certified public accountant
or other qualified third-party auditor for an applicant or licensee and incorporate the
audit report in any report of examination or investigation.
C. The commissioner shall have the broad administrative authority to
administer, interpret, and enforce the provisions of this Chapter, to promulgate rules
or regulations for the implementation of this Chapter, and to recover the cost of
administering and enforcing this Chapter by imposing and collecting proportionate
and equitable fees and costs associated with applications, examinations,
investigations, and other actions required to achieve the purpose of this Chapter.
D. Pursuant to the provisions of this Title, including but not limited to R.S.
6:103, all records of the office are strictly confidential and not subject to disclosure.
§1037. Supervision
A.(1) Each person required to be licensed and his authorized agent shall
maintain in his office the books, records, and accounts of his money transmission
activities as the commissioner may reasonably require in order to determine whether
the person is complying with the provisions of this Chapter and the rules and
regulations related thereto.
(2) Required records may be maintained in any electronic format consistent
with the person's ordinary business practices unless the person receives specific
written instructions from the commissioner to the contrary.
(3) The books, records, and accounts shall be maintained separately and
apart from any other business in which the person is involved and shall be kept at the
Page 12 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
location in the state at which the money transmission activities occurred or at the
person's principal office unless otherwise permitted in writing by the commissioner.
(4) Records shall be made available for review or examination at a
nonresidential location approved by the commissioner.
B. If the books and records of any person described in this Section are
located outside of the state, he shall make them available to the commissioner at a
location within this state convenient to the commissioner or pay the reasonable and
necessary expenses for the commissioner or his representative to examine them at
the place where they are maintained. The commissioner may designate
representatives, including comparable officials of the state in which the records are
located, to inspect the records on his behalf.
C. The licensee shall pay an examination fee of fifty dollars per hour for
each examiner, plus the actual cost of subsistence, lodging, and transportation for
out-of-state examinations, not to exceed the amounts provided for in the division of
administration travel regulations in force at the time of the examination. If the
examination fee is not paid within thirty calendar days of its assessment, the person
examined shall be subject to an administrative penalty.
D. In addition to any other powers or authority granted in this Title, the
commissioner may at any time do any of the following:
(1) Conduct on-site examination or investigation, participate in a joint or
concurrent examination or investigation with another state or federal agency or
agencies, or examine or investigate the books, records, and accounts used in the
business of every licensee.
(2) Accept and rely upon an examination report or investigative report of any
other state or federal agency.
E. Nothing in Subsection D of this Section shall preclude the commissioner
from conducting an examination or investigation in accordance with applicable
provisions of this Chapter, including but not limited to any of the following:
(1) Participating in a joint examination or investigation.

Page 13 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(2) Participating in a concurrent examination or investigation.
(3) Accepting results of an examination or investigation report conducted by
any state or federal agency.
F. A joint report or concurrent report accepted by the commissioner pursuant
to this Section may be accepted as an official report of the office.
G.(1) To efficiently and effectively enforce the provisions of this Chapter
and to minimize regulatory burdens, the commissioner may participate in a
multistate examination and investigation process for licensees that hold licenses in
this state and other states.
(2) As a participant in any multistate examination or investigation, the
commissioner may, to the extent provided by law, do all of the following:
(a) Cooperate, coordinate, and share information with other state regulators
of money transmission activities.
(b) Enter into written cooperation, coordination, or information-sharing
contracts or agreements with organizations made up of other state governmental
regulators of money transmission activities.
(c) Cooperate, coordinate, and share information with organizations made
up of other state governmental regulators of money transmission activities, if the
organizations agree in writing to maintain confidentiality and security of shared
information.
(3) Nothing in this Section shall constitute a waiver of the commissioner's
authority to do any of the following:
(a) Conduct any examination or investigation authorized by law.
(b) Otherwise take any independent action authorized by law or any rule
promulgated in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
(c) Enforce compliance with any order issued pursuant to this Chapter.
(4) The following shall not constitute a waiver of any examination fee
provided pursuant to this Chapter or any rule promulgated in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act:
Page 14 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(a) The commissioner's participation in any joint examination or
investigation.
(b) The commissioner's acceptance of an examination or investigative report
conducted and prepared by other state or federal regulators of money transmission
activity.
§1038. Networked supervision
A. To efficiently and effectively administer and enforce this Chapter and to
minimize regulatory burden, the commissioner is authorized to participate in
multistate supervisory processes established between states and coordinated through
the Conference of State Bank Supervisors, the Money Transmitter Regulators
Association, and affiliates and successors thereof, for all licensees that hold licenses
in this state and other states. As a participant in multistate supervision, the
commissioner may do any of the following:
(1) Cooperate, coordinate, and share information with other state and federal
regulators in accordance with the provisions of this Title.
(2) Enter into written cooperation, coordination, or information-sharing
contracts, or agreements with organizations the membership of which is made up of
state or federal governmental agencies.
(3) Cooperate, coordinate, and share information with organizations in
accordance with the provisions of this Title, the membership of which is made up of
state or federal governmental agencies, provided that the organizations agree in
writing to maintain the confidentiality and security of the shared information.
B. The commissioner may not waive, and nothing in this Section constitutes
a waiver of, the commissioner's authority to conduct an examination or investigation
or otherwise take independent action authorized by this Chapter or a rule or
regulation adopted, or order issued relative thereto to enforce compliance with
applicable state or federal law.
C. A joint examination or investigation, or acceptance of an examination or
investigation report, does not waive an examination fee provided for in this Chapter.
Page 15 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
§1039. License required
A. A person may not engage in the business of money transmission or
advertise, solicit, or hold itself out as providing money transmission unless the
person is licensed pursuant to this Chapter.
B. Subsection A of this Section does not apply to any of the following:
(1) A person who is an authorized agent of a person licensed in accordance
with this Chapter acting within the scope of authority conferred by a written contract
with the licensee.
(2) A person who is exempt pursuant to R.S. 6:1034 and does not engage in
money transmission outside the scope of such exemption.
C. A license issued pursuant to R.S. 6:1043 is not transferable or assignable.
§1040. Consistent state licensing
A. To establish consistent licensing between this state and other states, the
commissioner may:
(1) Implement all licensing provisions of this Chapter in a manner that is
consistent with other states that have adopted similar laws or multistate licensing
processes.
(2) Participate in nationwide protocols for licensing cooperation and
coordination among state regulators if such protocols are consistent with this
Chapter.
B. In order to fulfill the purposes of this Chapter, the commissioner may
establish relationships or contracts with NMLS or other entities designated by NMLS
to enable the commissioner to do all of the following:
(1) Collect and maintain records.
(2) Coordinate multistate licensing processes and supervision processes.
(3) Process fees.
(4) Facilitate communication between the state and licensees or other
persons.
C. The commissioner may utilize NMLS for all aspects of licensing,
including but not limited to license applications, applications for acquisitions of
Page 16 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
control, surety bonds, reporting, criminal history background checks, credit checks,
fee processing, and examinations.
D. The commissioner may utilize NMLS forms, processes, and
functionalities. In the event NMLS does not provide functionality, forms, or
processes, the commissioner may strive to implement the requirements of this
Section in a manner that facilitates uniformity with respect to licensing, supervision,
reporting, and regulation of licensees which are licensed in multiple jurisdictions.
E. Every person required to be licensed shall register with NMLS and be
subject to such registration and renewal requirements as may be established by
NMLS in addition to any requirements of this Chapter.
§1041. Application for license
A. Applicants for a license shall apply in a form and in a medium as
prescribed by the commissioner. Each such form shall contain content as set forth
by rule, regulation, instruction, or procedure of the commissioner and may be
changed or updated by the commissioner in accordance with applicable law in order
to carry out the purposes of this Chapter and maintain consistency with NMLS
licensing standards and practices. The application shall state or contain, as
applicable:
(1) The legal name and residential and business addresses of the applicant
and any fictitious or trade name used by the applicant in conducting his business.
(2) A list of any criminal convictions of the applicant and any material
litigation in which the applicant has been involved in the ten-year period next
preceding the submission of the application.
(3) A description of any money transmission activities previously provided
by the applicant and the money transmission that the applicant seeks to provide in
this state.
(4) A list of the applicant's proposed authorized agent and the locations in
this state where the applicant and its authorized agent propose to engage in money
transmission.
Page 17 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(5) A list of other states in which the applicant is licensed to engage in
money transmission and any license revocations, suspensions, or other disciplinary
action taken against the applicant in another state.
(6) Information concerning any bankruptcy or receivership proceedings
affecting the licensee or a person in control of a licensee.
(7) A sample form of contract for authorized agent, if applicable.
(8) The source of funds and credit to be used by the applicant to conduct
money transmission activities with, or on behalf of, an individual and documentation
demonstrating that the applicant has the tangible net worth required pursuant to R.S.
6:1059.
(9) Evidence of registration if the applicant is required to register with the
Financial Crimes Enforcement Network of the United States Department of Treasury
as a money service business.
(10) A sample form of payment instrument or stored value, as applicable.
(11) The name and address of any federally insured depository financial
institution through which the applicant plans to conduct money transmission.
(12) An investigative background report prepared by an independent search
firm as required by R.S. 6:1042(B) from any key individuals who have resided
outside the United States at any time in the last ten years.
(13) Any other information the commissioner or NMLS requires with respect
to the applicant.
B. If an applicant is a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or
other legal entity, the applicant shall also provide all of the following:
(1) The date of the applicant's incorporation or formation and state or
country of incorporation or formation.
(2) If applicable, a certificate of good standing from the state or country in
which the applicant is incorporated or formed.
(3) A brief description of the structure or organization of the applicant,
including any parents or subsidiaries of the applicant, and whether any parents or
subsidiaries are publicly traded.
Page 18 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(4) The legal name, any fictitious or trade name, all business and residential
addresses, and the employment, as applicable, in the ten-year period next preceding
the submission of the application of each key individual and person in control of the
applicant.
(5) A list of any criminal convictions and material litigation in which a
person in control of the applicant who is not an individual has been involved in the
ten-year period next preceding the submission of the application.
(6) A copy of the audited financial statements of the applicant for the most
recent fiscal year and for the two-year period next preceding the submission of the
application.
(7) A certified copy of the unaudited financial statements of the applicant for
the most recent fiscal quarter.
(8) If the applicant is a publicly traded corporation, a copy of the most recent
report filed with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission in
accordance with Section 13 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. 78m,
as amended or recodified from time to time.
(9) If the applicant is a wholly owned subsidiary of one of the following:
(a) A corporation publicly traded in the United States, a copy of audited
financial statements for the parent corporation for the most recent fiscal year or a
copy of the parent corporation's most recent report filed in accordance with Section
13 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. 78m, as amended or recodified
from time to time.
(b) A corporation publicly traded outside the United States, a copy of similar
documentation filed with the regulator of the parent corporation's domicile outside
the United States.
(10) The name and address of the applicant's registered agent in this state.
(11) Any other information the commissioner may require with respect to the
applicant.
C. A nonrefundable application fee of one thousand five hundred dollars
shall accompany an application for a license pursuant to this Section. However,
Page 19 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
beginning with calendar year 2026 and for each subsequent calendar year, on or
before July first of the following year, the commissioner shall issue a memo
authorizing a new application fee in accordance with this Section. The new amount
will be calculated by applying any increase or decrease in the United States Bureau
of Labor Statistics Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the previous
calendar year to the previous year's license fee amount and rounding that amount
upward to the nearest one-hundred-dollar increment.
D. If any material information provided in connection with an application
changes during the application review period, the applicant shall immediately notify
the commissioner.
§1042. Information requirements for certain persons
A. Any person in control of a licensee or applicant, any person who seeks
to acquire control of a licensee, and each key individual shall furnish to the
commissioner through NMLS all of the following items:
(1) The person's fingerprints for submission to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and the commissioner for purposes of a national criminal history
background check unless the person currently resides outside of the United States
and has resided outside of the United States for the last ten years.
(2) Personal history and experience in a form and in a medium prescribed by
the commissioner, to obtain both of the following:
(a) Information related to any criminal convictions or pending charges,
provided an applicant shall not have been convicted of a felony in any jurisdiction
or a misdemeanor of fraud, theft, forgery, bribery, embezzlement, or making a
fraudulent or false statement in any jurisdiction.
(b) Information related to any regulatory or administrative action and any
civil litigation involving claims of fraud, misrepresentation, conversion,
mismanagement of funds, breach of fiduciary duty, or breach of contract.
B. If the person has resided outside of the United States at any time in the
last ten years, the person shall also provide an investigative background report
prepared by an independent search firm that meets all of the following requirements:
Page 20 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(1) At a minimum, the search firm shall do all of the following:
(a) Demonstrate that it has sufficient knowledge, resources, and employs
accepted and reasonable methodologies to conduct the research for the background
report.
(b) Not be affiliated with or have any direct or indirect interest in or with the
individual it is researching.
(2) At a minimum, the investigative background report shall be written in the
English language and shall contain all of the following:
(a) If available in the person's current jurisdiction of residency, a
comprehensive credit report, or any equivalent information obtained or generated by
the independent search firm to accomplish such report, including a search of the
court data in the countries, provinces, states, cities, towns, and contiguous areas
where the individual resided and worked.
(b) Criminal records information for the past ten years, including but not
limited to felonies, misdemeanors, or similar convictions for violations of law in the
countries, provinces, states, cities, towns, and contiguous areas where the individual
resided and worked.
(c) Employment history.
(d) Media history, including an electronic search of national and local
publications, wire services, and business applications.
(e) Financial services-related regulatory history, including but not limited to
money transmission, securities, banking, insurance, and mortgage-related industries.
§1043. Issuance of license
A. When the commissioner determines that an application is complete, the
commissioner shall promptly notify the applicant in a record of the date on which the
application is determined to be complete and one of the following will occur:
(1) The commissioner shall approve or deny the application within one
hundred twenty calendar days after the completion date.
(2) If the application is not approved or denied within one hundred twenty
calendar days after the completion date all of the following will occur:
Page 21 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(a) The application is deemed approved.
(b) The license takes effect as of the first business day after expiration of the
one-hundred-twenty-day period.
(3) The commissioner may for good cause extend the application period.
B. A determination by the commissioner that an application is complete and
is accepted for processing means only that the application, on its face, appears to
include all of the items, including the criminal background check response from the
Federal Bureau of Investigation, and address all of the matters that are required, and
is not an assessment of the substance of the application or of the sufficiency of the
information provided.
C. When an application is filed and considered complete pursuant to this
Section, the commissioner shall investigate the applicant's financial condition and
responsibility, financial and business experience, character, and general fitness. The
commissioner may conduct an on-site investigation of the applicant, the cost of
which the applicant shall pay. The commissioner shall issue a license to an applicant
pursuant to this Section if the commissioner finds that all of the following conditions
have been fulfilled:
(1) The applicant has complied with R.S. 6:1041 and 1042.
(2) The applicant's financial condition and responsibility are compliant with
R.S. 6:1059, 1060, and 1061, and the financial and business experience, competence,
character, and general fitness of the applicant, and the competence, experience,
character, and general fitness of the key individuals and persons in control of the
applicant indicate that it is in the interest of the public to permit the applicant to
engage in money transmission.
D. If an applicant avails himself or is otherwise subject to a multistate
licensing process one of the following applies:
(1) The commissioner may accept the investigation results of a lead
investigative state for the purpose of Subsection C of this Section if the lead
investigative state has sufficient staffing, expertise, and minimum standards.
Page 22 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(2) If Louisiana is a lead investigative state, the commissioner may
investigate the applicant pursuant to Subsection C of this Section and the timeframes
established by agreement through the multistate licensing process, provided,
however, that in no case shall such timeframe be noncompliant with the application
period in Paragraph (A)(1) of this Section.
E.(1) The commissioner shall issue a formal written notice of the denial of
a license application. The commissioner shall set forth in the notice of denial the
reasons for the denial of the application.
(2) The applicant may appeal within thirty calendar days after receipt of the
written notice of the denial. If the office has not received the applicant's request for
appeal within that period, then the applicant is deemed to have waived all rights of
appeal. All appeals shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
F. If an applicant for a license pursuant to this Chapter does not complete the
license application and fails to respond to a notice or notices from the commissioner
to correct a deficiency or deficiencies for a period of one hundred twenty calendar
days or more after the date the commissioner sends the initial notice to correct the
deficiency or deficiencies, the office may deem the application as abandoned and
may issue a notice of abandonment of the application to the applicant in lieu of
proceedings to deny the application.
G. The initial license term shall begin on the day the application is approved.
The license shall expire on December thirty-first of the year in which the license
term began, unless the initial license date is between November first and December
thirty-first, in which instance the initial license term shall expire on December thirty-
first of the following year.
§1044. Renewal of license
A.(1) Each person licensed as a money transmitter in accordance with this
Chapter shall submit an annual license renewal application and a nonrefundable fee
in the amount of eight hundred dollars, plus one hundred dollars for each location in
excess of one in Louisiana through which the licensee plans to conduct money
transmission during the license year for which the fee is paid, shall be paid, provided
Page 23 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
that in no event shall the annual renewal fee exceed six thousand dollars. The annual
renewal application fee shall be submitted on or before December thirty-first of each
year in a manner and form prescribed by the commissioner and submit to the
commissioner a renewal report pursuant to Paragraph (B)(3) of this Section if the
person is not issued a new license from November first to December thirty-first of
that year. A money transmission license issued during this time period will expire
on December thirty-first of the following calendar year.
(2) An annual renewal application shall be accompanied by the required
annual license renewal fees, as required pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
An annual license renewal application submitted after December thirty-first and
before March first of the following year shall be charged a nonrefundable annual
license renewal late fee in the amount of six hundred dollars, in addition to the
annual license renewal fee.
B.(1) If the annual renewal application is submitted timely on or before
December thirty-first, the license shall remain in force and effect until the renewal
application is either approved or denied by the commissioner. Nothing in this
Paragraph shall preclude the commissioner from implementing any administrative
or enforcement action authorized by this Chapter for violations of this Chapter or for
any material representation that may have occurred prior to the renewal date of a
license.
(2) If the commissioner has not received the renewal fee and late fee before
March first, the license to engage in money transmission activities shall expire
without a hearing or notification, and the license shall not be reinstated. However,
the person whose license has expired may apply for a new license, subject to all new
license application requirements of this Chapter. Prior to such application being
complete and eligible for approval consideration, the applicant shall be subject to and
pay unlicensed activity civil money penalties in an amount determined by the
commissioner.
(3) A licensee shall submit a renewal report with the renewal fee, in a form
and in a manner prescribed by the commissioner. The renewal report shall state or
Page 24 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
contain a description of each material change in information submitted by the
licensee in its original license application and which has not been previously reported
to the commissioner.
(4) The commissioner may utilize NMLS to process license renewals if such
functionality is consistent with this Section.
§1045. Maintenance of license
A. If a licensee does not continue to meet the qualifications or satisfy the
requirements that apply to an applicant for a new money transmission license, the
commissioner may suspend or revoke the licensee's license in accordance with the
procedures established by this Chapter or other applicable state law for such
suspension or revocation.
B. An applicant for a money transmission license shall demonstrate that he
meets or will meet, and a money transmission licensee shall at all times meet, the
requirements in R.S. 6:1059, 1060, and 1061.
§1046. Acquisition of control
A. Any person, or group of persons acting in concert, seeking to acquire
control of a licensee shall obtain the written approval of the commissioner prior to
acquiring control.
B. A person, or group of persons acting in concert, seeking to acquire control
of a licensee shall, in cooperation with the licensee, do both of the following:
(1) Submit an application in a form and in a manner prescribed by the
commissioner.
(2) Submit a nonrefundable fee of one thousand five hundred dollars as
required in accordance with R.S. 6:1041 with the request for approval.
C. Upon request, the commissioner may permit a licensee or the person, or
group of persons acting in concert, to submit some or all information required by the
commissioner pursuant to Paragraph (B)(1) of this Section without using NMLS.
D. The application required by Paragraph (B)(1) of this Section shall include
information required by R.S. 6:1042 for any new key individuals who have not
previously completed the requirements of R.S. 6:1041 for a licensee.
Page 25 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
E.(1) When the commissioner determines an application for acquisition of
control in accordance with this Section appears to include all the items and addresses
all of the matters that are required, the application shall be considered complete, and
the commissioner shall do all of the following:
(a) Promptly notify the applicant in a record of the date on which the
application was determined to be complete.
(b) Approve or deny the application within sixty calendar days after the
completion date.
(2) If the application is not approved or denied within sixty calendar days
after the completion date, both of the following apply:
(a) The application is approved.
(b) The person, or group of persons acting in concert, is not prohibited from
acquiring control.
(3) The commissioner may for good cause extend the application period.
F. A determination by the commissioner that an application is complete and
is accepted for processing means only that the application, on its face, appears to
include all of the items and address all of the matters that are required, and is not an
assessment of the substance of the application or of the sufficiency of the
information provided.
G. When an application is filed and considered complete in accordance with
Subsection E of this Section, the commissioner shall investigate the financial
condition and responsibility, financial and business experience, character, and
general fitness of the person, or group of persons acting in concert, seeking to
acquire control. The commissioner shall approve an acquisition of control pursuant
to this Section if the commissioner finds that all of the following conditions have
been fulfilled:
(1) The requirements of Subsections B and D of this Section, and the
provisions of R.S. 6:1059, 1060, and 1061 have been met, as applicable.
(2) The financial condition and responsibility, financial and business
experience, competence, character, and general fitness of the person, or group of
Page 26 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
persons acting in concert, seeking to acquire control, and the competence,
experience, character, and general fitness of the key individuals and persons that
would be in control of the licensee after the acquisition of control indicate that it is
in the interest of the public to permit the person, or group of persons acting in
concert, to control the licensee.
H. If an applicant avails himself or is otherwise subject to a multistate
licensing process:
(1) The commissioner may accept the investigation results of a lead
investigative state for the purpose of Subsection G of this Section if the lead
investigative state has sufficient staffing, expertise, and minimum standards.
(2) If Louisiana is a lead investigative state, the commissioner may
investigate the applicant pursuant to Subsection G of this Section and the timeframes
established by agreement through the multistate licensing process.
I.(1) The commissioner shall issue a formal written notice of the denial of
an application to acquire control. The commissioner shall set forth in the notice of
denial the reasons for the denial of the application.
(2) The applicant may appeal within thirty calendar days after receipt of the
written notice of the denial. If the office has not received the applicant's request for
appeal within that period, then the applicant is deemed to have waived all rights of
appeal. All appeals shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
J. The requirements of Subsections A and B of this Section do not apply to
any of the following:
(1) A person who acts as a proxy for the sole purpose of voting at a
designated meeting of the shareholders or holders of voting shares or voting interests
of a licensee or a person in control of a licensee.
(2) A person who acquires control of a licensee by devise or descent,
provided the person has not been convicted of a felony offense and is in compliance
with R.S. 6:1043.
Page 27 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(3) A person who acquires control of a licensee as a personal representative,
custodian, guardian, conservator, or trustee, or as an officer appointed by a court of
competent jurisdiction or by operation of law.
(4) A person who is exempt pursuant to R.S. 6:1034(7).
(5) A person who the commissioner determines is not subject to Subsection
A of this Section based on the public interest.
(6) A public offering of securities of a licensee or a person in control of a
licensee.
(7) An internal reorganization of a person in control of the licensee where
the ultimate person in control of the licensee remains the same.
K. Persons outlined in Paragraphs (J)(2) through (7) of this Section in
cooperation with the licensee shall notify the commissioner within fifteen calendar
days after the acquisition of control.
L.(1) The requirements of Subsections A and B of this Section do not apply
to a person who has complied with and received approval to engage in money
transmission pursuant to this Chapter or was identified as a person in control in a
prior application filed with and approved by the commissioner or by an
MSB-accredited state pursuant to a multistate licensing process, if all of the
following applies:
(a) The person has not had a license revoked or suspended or controlled a
licensee that has had a license revoked or suspended while the person was in control
of the licensee in the previous five years.
(b) If the person is a licensee, the person is well managed and has received
at least a satisfactory rating for compliance at its most recent examination by an
MSB-accredited state if such rating was given.
(c) The licensee to be acquired is projected to meet the requirements of R.S.
6:1059, 1060, and 1061 after the acquisition of control is completed, and if the
person acquiring control is a licensee, that licensee is also projected to meet the
requirements of R.S. 6:1059, 1060, and 1061 after the acquisition of control is
completed.
Page 28 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(d) The licensee to be acquired will not implement any material changes to
its business plan as a result of the acquisition of control, and if the person acquiring
control is a licensee, that licensee also will not implement any material changes to
its business plan as a result of the acquisition of control.
(e) The person provides notice of the acquisition in cooperation with the
licensee and attests to Subparagraphs (a) through (d) of this Paragraph in a form and
in a medium prescribed by the commissioner.
(2) If the notice is not disapproved within thirty calendar days after the date
on which the notice was determined to be complete, the notice is deemed approved.
(3) Before filing an application for approval to acquire control of a licensee
a person may request in writing a determination from the commissioner as to
whether the person would be considered a person in control of a licensee upon
consummation of a proposed transaction. If the commissioner determines that the
person would not be a person in control of a licensee, the proposed person and
transaction are not subject to the requirements of Subsections A and B of this
Section.
M. If a multistate licensing process includes a determination pursuant to
Paragraph (L)(3) of this Section and an applicant avails itself or is otherwise subject
to the multistate licensing process:
(1) The commissioner may accept the control determination of a lead
investigative state with sufficient staffing, expertise, and minimum standards for the
purpose of Paragraph (L)(3) of this Section.
(2) If Louisiana is a lead investigative state, the commissioner may
investigate the applicant pursuant to this Subsection and the timeframes established
by agreement through the multistate licensing process.
§1047. Notice and information requirements for a change of key individuals
A.(1) A licensee adding or replacing any key individual shall do both of the
following:
(a) Provide notice in a manner prescribed by the commissioner within fifteen
calendar days after the effective date of the key individual's appointment.
Page 29 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(b) Provide information as required by R.S. 6:1042 within forty-five calendar
days of the effective date of the key individual's appointment.
(2) Within ninety calendar days of the date on which the notice provided
pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection was determined to be complete, the
commissioner may issue a notice of disapproval of a key individual if the
competence, experience, character, or integrity of the individual would not be in the
best interests of the public or the customers of the licensee to permit the individual
to be a key individual of such licensee.
(3)(a) A notice of disapproval shall contain a statement of the basis for
disapproval and shall be sent to the licensee and the disapproved individual.
(b) The licensee may appeal within thirty calendar days after receipt of the
written notice of the disapproval. If the office has not received the licensee's request
for appeal within that period, then the licensee is deemed to have waived all rights
of appeal. All appeals shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
(4) If the notice provided pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection is not
disapproved within ninety calendar days after the date on which the notice was
determined to be complete, the key individual is deemed approved.
B. If a multistate licensing process includes a key individual notice review
and disapproval process pursuant to this Section and the licensee avails itself or is
otherwise subject to the multistate licensing process:
(1) The commissioner may accept the determination of another state if the
investigating state has sufficient staffing, expertise, and minimum standards for the
purpose of this Section.
(2) If Louisiana is a lead investigative state, the commissioner may
investigate the applicant pursuant to this Subsection and the timeframes established
by agreement through the multistate licensing process.
§1048. Report of condition
A. Each licensee shall submit a report of condition, which shall be known
as a Call Report, within forty-five calendar days of the end of the calendar quarter,
or within any extended time as the commissioner may prescribe.
Page 30 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
B.(1) The report of condition shall include all of the following:
(a) Financial information at the licensee level.
(b) Nationwide and state-specific money transmission transaction
information in every jurisdiction in the United States where the licensee is licensed
to engage in money transmission.
(c) Permissible investments report.
(d) Transaction destination country reporting for money received for
transmission, if applicable.
(e) Any other information the commissioner requires with respect to the
licensee.
(2) The commissioner may utilize NMLS for the submission of the report
required by Subsection A of this Section and is authorized to change or update as
necessary the requirements of this Section to carry out the purposes of this Chapter
and maintain consistency with NMLS reporting.
C. The information required by Paragraph (B)(1) of this Section shall only
be included in a report of condition submitted within forty-five calendar days of the
end of the fourth calendar quarter.
§1049. Audited financials
A. Each licensee shall, within ninety calendar days after the end of each
fiscal year, or within any extended time as the commissioner may prescribe, file with
the commissioner both of the following:
(1) An audited financial statement of the licensee for the fiscal year prepared
in accordance with United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles.
(2) Any other information as the commissioner may require.
B. The audited financial statements shall be prepared by an independent
certified public accountant or independent public accountant who is satisfactory to
the commissioner.
C. The audited financial statements shall include or be accompanied by a
certificate of opinion of the independent certified public accountant or independent
public accountant that is satisfactory in form and content to the commissioner. If the
Page 31 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
certificate or opinion is qualified, the commissioner may order the licensee to take
any action as the commissioner may find necessary to enable the independent or
certified public accountant or independent public accountant to remove the
qualification.
§1050. Authorized agent reporting
A. Each licensee shall submit a report of authorized agent within forty-five
calendar days of the end of the calendar quarter. The commissioner may utilize
NMLS for the submission of the report required by this Subsection provided that the
functionality is consistent with the requirements of this Section. The utilization shall
include the NMLS Uniform Authorized Agent Reporting process, or such other
similar process as designated by NMLS.
B. The authorized agent report shall include, at a minimum, each authorized
agent's:
(1) Company legal name.
(2) Taxpayer employer identification number.
(3) Principal provider identifier.
(4) Physical address.
(5) Mailing address.
(6) Any business conducted in other states.
(7) Any fictitious or trade name.
(8) Contact person name, phone number, and email address.
(9) Start date as licensee's authorized agent.
(10) End date acting as licensee's authorized agent, if applicable.
(11) Any other information the commissioner requires with respect to the
authorized agent.
§1051. Reports of certain events
A. A licensee shall file a report with the commissioner within one business
day after the licensee knows or should have known of any of the following events:
Page 32 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(1) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee pursuant to the United
States Bankruptcy Code, 11 U.S.C. 101 through 110, both inclusive, as amended or
recodified from time to time, for bankruptcy or reorganization.
(2) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee for receivership, the
commencement of any other judicial or administrative proceeding for its dissolution
or reorganization, or the making of a general assignment for the benefit of its
creditors.
(3) The commencement of a proceeding to revoke or suspend its license in
a state or country in which the licensee engages in business or is licensed.
B.(1) A licensee shall file a report with the commissioner within three
business days after the licensee has reason to know of the occurrence of any of the
following events:
(a) An indictment, charge, or conviction of the licensee or of a key individual
or person in control of the licensee for a felony.
(b) An indictment, charge, or conviction of an authorized agent for a felony.
(2)(a) Except as provided in Subparagraphs (b) and (c) of this Paragraph, a
licensee shall notify the commissioner in writing or through the NMLS within three
business days after the time that the licensee becomes aware of any breach of
security of the system of computerized data owned or licensed by the licensee, which
contains personal information about a Louisiana resident, or the unauthorized access
to or use of such information about a Louisiana resident as a result of the breach. For
purposes of this Subparagraph, the terms breach of the security of the system and
personal information have the same meaning as in R.S. 51:3073.
(b) If a licensee would be required pursuant to Louisiana law to provide
notification to a Louisiana resident regarding the breach, then the licensee shall
provide a copy of such notification to the commissioner prior to or simultaneously
with the licensee's notification to the Louisiana resident.
(c) Notice required by this Subsection may be delayed if a law enforcement
agency determines that the notice will impede a criminal investigation. Notice shall
be made in good faith and without unreasonable delay as soon as possible after the
Page 33 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
law enforcement agency determines that notification will no longer impede the
investigation.
§1052. Reports required by federal law
A licensee and an authorized agent shall file all reports required by federal
currency reporting, record keeping, and suspicious activity reporting requirements
as set forth in the Bank Secrecy Act and other federal and state laws pertaining to
money laundering. The timely filing of a complete and accurate report required
pursuant to this Section with the appropriate federal agency is deemed compliant
with the requirements of this Section.
§1053. Records
A. A licensee shall maintain all of the following records, for determining his
compliance with this Chapter for at least five years:
(1) A record of each money transmission obligation sold.
(2) A general ledger posted at least monthly containing all asset, liability,
capital, income, and expense accounts.
(3) All bank statements and bank reconciliation records.
(4) All records of outstanding money transmission, including but not limited
to a list of residents and the most recent residential address.
(5) Records of each outstanding money transmission obligation paid within
the five-year period.
(6) A list of the last-known names and addresses of all of the licensee's
authorized agents.
(7) Any other records the commissioner requires by rule, regulation, or
order.
B. The items specified in Subsection A of this Section shall be maintained
in written or electronic form.
C. Records specified in Subsection A of this Section may be maintained
outside this state if they are made accessible to the commissioner on seven business
days' notice that is sent in a record.
Page 34 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
D. All records maintained by the licensee as required in Subsections A
through C of this Section are subject to inspection by the commissioner pursuant to
R.S. 6:1037(A).
E. Each licensee shall maintain written policies and procedures sufficient for
it to comply with this Chapter and all other laws and regulations applicable to the
conduct of its licensed business.
§1054. Relationship between licensee and authorized agent
A. As used in this Section, "remit" means to make direct payments of money
to a licensee or its representative authorized to receive money or to deposit money
in a bank in an account specified by the licensee.
B. Before a licensee may conduct business through an authorized agent or
allows a person to act as the licensee's authorized agent, the licensee shall do all of
the following:
(1) Adopt, and update as necessary, written policies and procedures designed
to ensure that the licensee's authorized agents comply with applicable state and
federal law.
(2) Enter into a written contract that complies with Subsection E of this
Section.
(3) Conduct a reasonable risk-based background investigation sufficient for
the licensee to determine whether the authorized agent has complied and will likely
comply with applicable state and federal law.
C. The licensee's authorized agents shall operate in full compliance with
applicable state and federal law, and the licensee shall be responsible for
implementing and maintaining a reasonable risk-based supervision program to
monitor its authorized agents.
D. An authorized agent shall operate in full compliance with this Chapter.
E. The written contract required by Paragraph (B)(2) of this Section shall be
signed by the licensee and the authorized agent and, at a minimum, shall do all of the
following:
Page 35 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(1) Appoint the person signing the contract as the licensee's authorized agent
with the authority to conduct money transmission on behalf of the licensee.
(2) Set forth the nature and scope of the relationship between the licensee
and the authorized agent and the respective rights and responsibilities of the parties.
(3) Require the authorized agent to agree to fully comply with all applicable
state and federal laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to money transmission,
including this Chapter and regulations related thereto, relevant provisions of the
Bank Secrecy Act and the USA PATRIOT Act.
(4) Require the authorized agent to remit and handle money and monetary
value in accordance with the terms of the contract between the licensee and the
authorized agent.
(5) Impose a trust on money and monetary value net of fees received for
money transmission for the benefit of the licensee.
(6) Require the authorized agent to prepare and maintain records as required
by this Chapter or regulations related thereto, or as requested by the commissioner.
(7) Acknowledge that the authorized agent consents to examination or
investigation by the commissioner.
(8) State that the licensee is subject to regulation by the commissioner and
that, as part of that regulation, the commissioner may suspend or revoke an
authorized agent designation or require the licensee to terminate an authorized agent
designation.
(9) Acknowledge receipt of the written policies and procedures required
pursuant to Paragraph (B)(1) of this Section.
F. If the licensee's license is suspended, revoked, surrendered, or expired, the
licensee shall, within five business days, provide documentation to the commissioner
that the licensee has notified all applicable authorized agents of the licensee whose
names are in a record filed with the commissioner of the suspension, revocation,
surrender, or expiration of a license. Upon suspension, revocation, surrender, or
expiration of a license, applicable authorized agents shall immediately cease to
provide money transmission as an authorized agent of the licensee.
Page 36 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
G. An authorized agent of a licensee shall hold in trust for the benefit of the
licensee all money net of fees received from money transmission. If any authorized
agent commingles any funds received from money transmission with any other funds
or property owned or controlled by the authorized agent, all commingled funds and
other property shall be considered held in trust in favor of the licensee in an amount
equal to the amount of money net of fees received from money transmission.
H. An authorized agent may not use a subagent to conduct money
transmission on behalf of a licensee.
§1055. Unauthorized activities; prohibited activities
A. A person shall not engage in the business of money transmission on
behalf of a person not licensed pursuant to this Chapter or not exempt pursuant to
R.S. 6:1034 and 1035. A person who engages in such activity provides money
transmission to the same extent as if the person were a licensee, and shall be jointly
and severally liable with the unlicensed or nonexempt person.
B. A person shall not engage in money transmission pursuant to this Chapter
if the transmission of money, or its equivalent, is undertaken for the purpose of debt
adjusting, as defined in R.S. 14:331.
C. For the purposes of this Section, money transmission for the purpose of
debt adjusting includes but is not limited to any activity in which a person, directly
or indirectly:
(1) Acts, or agrees to act, as an agent, processor, custodian, intermediary,
clearing entity, payment service provider, escrow service, or similar function for a
debt adjustor or debtor.
(2) Receives, holds, distributes, or disburses money, or its equivalent,
provided by or on behalf of a debtor in connection with debt adjusting.
(3) Transmits money, or its equivalent, in the name of, at the direction of, or
for the benefit of a debt adjustor or a debtor.
D. A person shall not avoid or attempt to avoid the prohibition against debt
adjusting in this Section by using any structure or arrangement, regardless of form,
including by:
Page 37 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(1) Structuring transactions so that the receipt of money, or its equivalent,
from a debtor and the distribution or disbursement of such money to creditors are
performed by different persons, whether affiliated or unaffiliated, including where
a third party receives debtor funds and a person distributes or disburses such funds,
when such activities are undertaken pursuant to a common plan, arrangement, or
understanding to accomplish debt adjusting.
(2) Characterizing debtor funds as fees, administrative payments, processing
payments, or any other designation.
(3) Transmitting, depositing, or maintaining a debtor's money, or its
equivalent, into pooled accounts, pass-through accounts, trust accounts, custodial
accounts, or similar accounts.
E. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit or limit debt
adjusting activities expressly permitted pursuant to R.S. 14:331(C), including the
receipt and disbursement of debtor funds to the extent authorized therein. A money
transmission license shall not be used to authorize, facilitate, or expand debt
adjusting activities, and a person holding such a license shall remain subject to the
prohibitions of this Section with respect to any money transmission that is not
otherwise permitted in accordance with R.S. 14:331(C).
§1056. Timely transmission
A. Every money transmitter licensee and its agents shall transmit the
monetary equivalent of all money or equivalent value received from a consumer for
transmission, net of any fees, or issue instructions committing the money or its
monetary equivalent, to the person designated by the consumer, or return such
amount to the consumer, within ten business days after receiving the money or
equivalent value, unless otherwise ordered by the consumer, accepted pursuant to the
terms of a contract for stored value or when the transmission is for the payment of
goods or services, or unless the licensee or its agent has reasonable cause to believe
that the sender may be a victim of fraud or that a crime or a violation of law has
occurred, is occurring, or will occur in connection with transmitting the money.
Page 38 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
B. If a licensee fails to forward money received for transmission in
accordance with this Section, the licensee shall respond to inquiries by the sender
with the reason for the failure unless providing a response would violate a state or
federal law, rule, or regulation.
C. For purposes of this Section, money is considered to have been
transmitted when it is mailed, released to the relevant payment system for delivery,
or is otherwise available to the person designated by the consumer and, where
possible, a reasonable effort has been made to inform the designated person that the
money is available.
D.(1) Any provision in a money transmitter licensee user policy or user
agreement which provides a financial penalty or stipulated damages against a
consumer or charitable organization as defined by R.S. 51:1901 for executing a
lawful and valid transaction pursuant to federal and state law is contrary to public
policy and shall be null and void.
(2) A money transmitter licensee shall provide notice to a consumer of any
transaction that the money transmitter finds to be or is suspected of being in violation
of the user policy or user agreement and for which the licensee seizes the transaction
funds, unless such notice is prohibited by law. Any funds seized by the money
transmitter prior to providing such notice, unless such notice is prohibited by law,
and found to be from a lawful and valid transaction in accordance with federal and
state law shall be processed by the licensee in accordance with Subsection A of this
Section.
E. The enforcement of any choice-of-law provision in a money transmitter
licensee user policy or user agreement that would result in a contravention of the
public policy of this state as expressed by Subsection D of this Section shall be null
and void to the extent of such contravention.
F. A money transmitter licensee that seizes or holds funds pursuant to a user
policy or user agreement provision that is subject to nullification as provided by this
Section shall return to the consumer any funds held or seized as a result of the
Page 39 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
violation, including any financial penalty or stipulated damages assessed, and the
money transmitter licensee may cancel the service contract.
G. The commissioner may enjoin a violation of this Chapter, and any such
violation shall be considered an unfair trade practice and shall subject violators to the
provisions of the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, R.S. 51:1401
et seq. Entities covered by this Section shall be subject to the enforcement powers
of the commissioner as provided in R.S. 6:121.1. For purposes of this Section, the
provisions of R.S. 51:1406 shall not apply to a money transmitter licensee.
H.(1) The provisions of this Section shall not apply to any federally insured
depository financial institution, its subsidiaries, or affiliates.
(2) The provisions of this Section shall not apply to an operator of a payment
system or its subsidiaries and affiliates which are exempt from licensing pursuant to
this Chapter to the extent that the operator of a payment system provides processing,
clearing, or settlement services, between or among persons, in connection with wire
transfers, credit card transactions, debit card transactions, stored value transactions,
automated clearing house transfers, or similar funds transfers.
§1057. Refunds
A. This Section does not apply to:
(1) Money received for transmission subject to the federal Remittance Rule,
12 CFR Part 1005, Subpart B, as amended or recodified from time to time.
(2) Money received for transmission pursuant to a written agreement
between the licensee and payee to process payments for goods or services provided
by the payee.
B. Every licensee shall refund to the sender within ten calendar days of
receipt of the sender's written request for a refund of any and all money received for
transmission unless any of the following applies:
(1) The money has been forwarded within ten calendar days of the date on
which the money was received for transmission.
Page 40 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(2) Instructions have been given committing an equivalent amount of money
to the person designated by the sender within ten calendar days of the date on which
the money was received for transmission.
(3) The agreement between the licensee and the sender instructs the licensee
to forward the money at a time that is beyond ten calendar days of the date on which
the money was received for transmission. If funds have not yet been forwarded in
accordance with the terms of the agreement between the licensee and the sender, the
licensee shall issue a refund in accordance with the other provisions of this Section.
(4) The refund is requested for a transaction that the licensee has not
completed based on a reasonable belief or a reasonable basis to believe that a crime
or violation of law, rule, or regulation has occurred, is occurring, or may occur.
(5) The refund request does not enable the licensee to:
(a) Identify the sender's name and address or telephone number.
(b) Identify the particular transaction to be refunded in the event the sender
has multiple transactions outstanding.
§1058. Receipts
A. This Section does not apply to any of the following:
(1) Money received for transmission subject to the federal Remittance Rule,
12 CFR Part 1005, Subpart B, as amended or recodified from time to time.
(2) Money received for transmission that is not primarily for personal,
family, or household purposes.
(3) Money received for transmission pursuant to a written agreement
between the licensee and payee to process payments for goods or services provided
by the payee.
B. For a transaction conducted in person, the receipt may be provided
electronically if the sender requests or agrees to receive an electronic receipt. For
a transaction conducted electronically or by phone, a receipt may be provided
electronically. All electronic receipts shall be provided in a retainable form.
C. Every licensee or its authorized agent shall provide the sender with a
receipt for money received for transmission.
Page 41 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(1) The receipt shall contain all of the following information, as applicable:
(a) The name of the sender.
(b) The name of the designated recipient.
(c) The date of the transaction.
(d) The unique transaction or identification number.
(e) The name of the licensee, NMLS Unique ID, the licensee's business
address, and the licensee's customer service telephone number.
(f) The amount of the transaction in United States dollars.
(g) Any fee charged by the licensee to the sender for the transaction.
(h) Any taxes collected by the licensee from the sender for the transaction.
(2) The receipt required by this Section shall be in English and in the
language principally used by the licensee or authorized agent to advertise, solicit, or
negotiate, either orally or in writing, for a transaction conducted in person,
electronically, or by phone, if other than English.
§1059. Required maintenance of tangible net worth
A. A licensee pursuant to this Chapter shall maintain at all times a tangible
net worth of the greater of one hundred thousand dollars or three percent of total
assets for the first one hundred million dollars, two percent of additional assets for
one hundred million dollars to one billion dollars, and one-half percent of additional
assets for over one billion dollars.
B. Tangible net worth shall be demonstrated at initial application by the
applicant's most recent audited statements pursuant to R.S. 6:1041(B)(6).
C. All licensing requirements, including renewals, relative to tangible net
worth shall be evidenced at the time of initial application for licensure and renewal,
maintained at all times during licensure and renewal, and reported annually to the
commissioner in accordance with R.S. 6:1044 (B)(3).
§1060. Surety bond
A. An applicant for a money transmission license shall provide, and a
licensee at all times shall maintain, a surety bond issued by a bonding company or
Page 42 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
insurance company authorized to do business in this state and in a form satisfactory
to the commissioner.
B.(1) The amount of the required surety bond shall be the greater of the
following:
(a) One hundred thousand dollars.
(b) An amount equal to one hundred percent of the licensee's average daily
money transmission liability in this state calculated for the most recently completed
three-month period, up to a maximum of five hundred thousand dollars.
(2) A licensee that maintains a bond in the maximum amount provided for
in Subparagraphs (1)(a) or (b) of this Subsection, as applicable, shall not be required
to calculate its average daily money transmission liability in this state for purposes
of this Section.
C. A licensee may exceed the maximum required bond amount pursuant to
R.S. 6:1062(G).
D. The bond shall be in a form satisfactory to the commissioner and shall be
for the use and benefit of the office and any claimants against the licensee or his
agents to secure the faithful performance of the obligations of the licensee and his
agents with respect to the receipt, handling, transmission, and payment of money in
connection with money transmissions in this state.
E. The surety bond shall be issued by a bonding or insurance company
authorized to do business in this state and in a form satisfactory to the commissioner
and payable to the office for the benefit of any claimant against the licensee to secure
the faithful performance of the obligations and duties of the licensee with respect to
money transmission activities with, or on behalf of, residents of this state and the
payment of required but unpaid fee amounts due to the office and assessed but
unpaid civil money penalties.
F. Any claimants against the licensee or his agents may themselves bring suit
directly on the bond, or the attorney general may bring suit on behalf of those
claimants, either in one action or successive actions.
Page 43 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
G. The commissioner may increase the required amount of the bond upon
the basis of the impaired financial condition of a licensee as evidenced by a reduction
in net worth, financial losses, or other relevant criteria.
H. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
commissioner may at any time, if in the commissioner's sole opinion the protection
of the public so requires, increase the principal sum of the bond required of any
applicant or licensee by this Chapter but in no case shall the principal sum of the
bond required exceed one million dollars.
§1061. Maintenance of permissible investments
A. A licensee shall maintain at all times permissible investments that have
a market value computed in accordance with United States Generally Accepted
Accounting Principles of not less than the aggregate amount of all of its outstanding
money transmission obligations in all states.
B. Except for permissible investments enumerated in R.S. 6:1062(A), the
commissioner, with respect to any licensee, may by rule, regulation, or order limit
the extent to which a specific investment maintained by a licensee within a class of
permissible investments may be considered a permissible investment, if the specific
investment represents undue risk to customers, not reflected in the market value of
investments.
C. Permissible investments, even if commingled with other assets of the
licensee, are held in trust for the benefit of the purchasers and holders of the
licensee's outstanding money transmission obligations in the event of insolvency, the
filing of a petition by or against the licensee in accordance with the United States
Bankruptcy Code, 11 U.S.C. 101 through 110, both inclusive, as amended or
recodified from time to time, for bankruptcy or reorganization, the filing of a petition
by or against the licensee for receivership, the commencement of any other judicial
or administrative proceeding for its dissolution or reorganization, or in the event of
an action by a creditor against the licensee who is not a beneficiary of this statutory
trust. No permissible investments impressed with a trust pursuant to this Subsection
Page 44 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
shall be subject to attachment, levy of execution, or sequestration by order of any
court, except for a beneficiary of this statutory trust.
D.(1) Upon the establishment of a statutory trust in accordance with
Subsection C of this Section or when any funds are drawn on a letter of credit
pursuant to R.S. 6:1062(B), the commissioner shall notify the applicable regulator
of each state in which the licensee is licensed to engage in money transmission, if
any, of the establishment of the trust or the funds drawn on the letter of credit, as
applicable.
(2) Notice shall be deemed satisfied if performed pursuant to a multistate
agreement or through NMLS.
(3) Funds drawn on a letter of credit, and any other permissible investments
held in trust for the benefit of the purchasers and holders of the licensee's outstanding
money transmission obligations, are deemed held in trust for the benefit of such
purchasers and holders on a pro rata and equitable basis in accordance with statutes
pursuant to which permissible investments are required to be held in this state, and
other states, as applicable.
(4) Any statutory trust established pursuant to this Subsection shall be
terminated upon extinguishment of all of the licensee's outstanding money
transmission obligations.
E. The commissioner, by rule, regulation, or by order may allow other types
of investments that the commissioner determines are of sufficient liquidity and
quality to be a permissible investment. The commissioner may participate in efforts
with other state regulators to determine that other types of investments are of
sufficient liquidity and quality to be a permissible investment.
§1062. Types of permissible investments
A. The following investments are permissible in accordance with R.S.
6:1061:
(1) Cash, including demand deposits, savings deposits, and funds in such
accounts held for the benefit of the licensee's customers in a federally insured
depository financial institution, and cash equivalents including Automated Clearing
Page 45 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
House, or ACH, items in transit to the licensee and ACH items or international wires
in transit to a payee, cash in transit via armored car, cash in smart safes, cash in
licensee-owned locations, debit card or credit card-funded transmission receivables
owed by any bank, or money market mutual funds rated "AAA" by Standard &
Poors, or the equivalent from any eligible rating service.
(2) Certificates of deposit or senior debt obligations of an insured depository
institution, as defined in Section 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C.
1813, as amended or recodified from time to time, or as defined in accordance with
the Federal Credit Union Act, 12 U.S.C. 1751, as amended or recodified from time
to time.
(3) An obligation of the United States or a commission, agency, or
instrumentality thereof, an obligation that is guaranteed fully as to principal and
interest by the United States, or an obligation of a state or a governmental
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality thereof.
B. The permissible investments listed in Subsection A of this Section shall
also include the full drawable amount of an irrevocable standby letter of credit for
which the stated beneficiary is the commissioner that stipulates that the beneficiary
need only draw a sight draft under the letter of credit and present it to obtain funds
up to the letter of credit amount within seven calendar days of presentation of the
items required by Subsection D of this Section. The letter of credit shall meet all of
the following requirements:
(1) Be issued by a federally insured depository financial institution, a foreign
bank that is authorized pursuant to federal law to maintain a federal agency or federal
branch office in a state or states, or a foreign bank that is authorized pursuant to state
law to maintain a branch in a state that do both of the following:
(a) Bears an eligible rating or whose parent company bears an eligible rating.
(b) Is regulated, supervised, and examined by United States federal or state
authorities having regulatory authority over banks, credit unions, and trust
companies.
Page 46 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(2) Be irrevocable, unconditional, and indicate that it is not subject to any
condition or qualifications outside of the letter of credit.
(3) Not contain reference to any other agreements, documents, or entities,
or otherwise provide for any security interest in the licensee.
(4) Contain an issue date and expiration date, and expressly provide for
automatic extension, without a written amendment, for an additional period of one
year from the present or each future expiration date, unless the issuer of the letter of
credit notifies the commissioner in writing by certified or registered mail or courier
mail or other receipted means, at least sixty calendar days prior to any expiration
date, that the irrevocable letter of credit will not be extended.
C. In the event of any notice of expiration or nonextension of a letter of
credit issued pursuant to Paragraph (B)(4) of this Section, the licensee shall be
required to demonstrate to the satisfaction of the commissioner, fifteen calendar days
prior to expiration, that the licensee maintains and will maintain permissible
investments in accordance with R.S. 6:1061(A) upon the expiration of the letter of
credit. If the licensee is not able to do so, the commissioner may draw on the letter
of credit in an amount up to the amount necessary to meet the licensee's requirements
to maintain permissible investments in accordance with R.S. 6:1061(A). Any such
draw shall be offset against the licensee's outstanding money transmission
obligations. The drawn funds shall be held in trust by the commissioner or the
commissioner's designated agent, to the extent authorized by law, as agent for the
benefit of the purchasers and holders of the licensee's outstanding money
transmission obligations.
D. The letter of credit shall provide that the issuer of the letter of credit will
honor, at sight, a presentation made by the beneficiary to the issuer of the following
documents on or prior to the expiration date of the letter of credit:
(1) The original letter of credit, including any amendments.
(2) A written statement from the beneficiary stating if any of the following
events have occurred:
Page 47 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(a) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee in accordance with the
United States Bankruptcy Code, 11 U.S.C. 101 through 110, both inclusive, as
amended or recodified from time to time, for bankruptcy or reorganization.
(b) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee for receivership, or the
commencement of any other judicial or administrative proceeding for its dissolution
or reorganization.
(c) The seizure of assets of a licensee by a commissioner pursuant to an
emergency order issued in accordance with applicable law, on the basis of an action,
violation, or condition that has caused or is likely to cause the insolvency of the
licensee.
(d) The beneficiary has received notice of expiration or nonextension of a
letter of credit and the licensee failed to demonstrate to the satisfaction of the
beneficiary that the licensee will maintain permissible investments in accordance
with R.S. 6:1061(A) upon the expiration or nonextension of the letter of credit.
E. The commissioner may designate an agent to serve on the commissioner's
behalf as beneficiary to a letter of credit so long as the agent and letter of credit meet
requirements established by the commissioner. The commissioner's agent may serve
as agent for multiple licensing authorities for a single irrevocable letter of credit if
the proceeds of the drawable amount for the purposes of this Subsection are assigned
to the commissioner.
F. The commissioner may participate in multistate processes designed to
facilitate the issuance and administration of letters of credit, including but not limited
to services provided by the NMLS and State Regulatory Registry, LLC.
G. The permissible investments listed in Subsection A of the Section shall
also include:
(1) One hundred percent of the surety bond provided for in accordance with
R.S. 6:1060 that exceeds the average daily money transmission liability in this state.
(2) Any other investment approved by the commissioner.
Page 48 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
H. Unless permitted by the commissioner by rule, regulation, or by order to
exceed the limit as set forth herein, the following investments are permissible
pursuant to R.S. 6:1062 to the extent specified:
(1) Receivables that are payable to a licensee from its authorized agents in
the ordinary course of business that are aged less than seven calendar days from their
issuance date, up to fifty percent of the aggregate value of the licensee's total
permissible investments.
(2) Of the receivables permissible pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection, receivables that are payable to a licensee from a single authorized agent
in the ordinary course of business may not exceed ten percent of the aggregate value
of the licensee's total permissible investments.
(3) The following investments are permissible up to twenty percent per
category and combined up to fifty percent of the aggregate value of the licensee's
total permissible investments:
(a) A short-term, up to six months, investment bearing an eligible rating.
(b) Commercial paper bearing an eligible rating.
(c) A bill, note, bond, or debenture bearing an eligible rating.
(d) United States tri-party repurchase agreements collateralized at one
hundred percent or more with United States government or agency securities,
municipal bonds, or other securities bearing an eligible rating.
(e) Money market mutual funds rated less than "AAA" and equal to or higher
than "A-" by Standard & Poors, or the equivalent from any other eligible rating
service.
(f) A mutual fund or other investment fund composed solely and exclusively
of one or more permissible investments listed in Subsection A of this Section.
I. Cash, including demand deposits, savings deposits, and funds in such
accounts held for the benefit of the licensee's customers, at foreign depository
institutions are permissible up to ten percent of the aggregate value of the licensee's
total permissible investments if the licensee has received a satisfactory rating in its
Page 49 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
most recent examination and the foreign depository institution meets all of the
following requirements:
(1) Has an eligible rating.
(2) Is registered pursuant to the United States Foreign Account Tax
Compliance Act.
(3) Is not located in any country subject to sanctions from the United States
Office of Foreign Asset Control.
(4) Is not located in a high-risk or noncooperative jurisdiction as designated
by the International Financial Action Task Force.
§1063. Suspension and revocation
A. The commissioner may suspend or revoke a license or order a licensee
to revoke the designation of an authorized agent if any of the following occur:
(1) The licensee violates any provision of this Chapter or a rule adopted or
regulation promulgated or order issued pursuant thereto.
(2) The licensee does not cooperate with an examination or investigation by
the commissioner.
(3) The licensee engages in fraud, intentional misrepresentation, or gross
negligence.
(4) An authorized agent is convicted of a violation of a state or federal
anti-money laundering statute, or violates any rule, regulation, or order related to the
provisions of this Chapter, as a result of the licensee's gross negligence, willful
misconduct, or willful blindness.
(5) The competence, experience, character, or general fitness of the licensee,
authorized agent, person in control of a licensee, key individual, or responsible
person of the authorized agent indicates that it is not in the public interest to permit
the person to provide money transmission.
(6) The licensee engages in an unsafe or unsound practice.
(7) The licensee is insolvent, suspends payment of its obligations, or makes
a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors.
Page 50 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(8) The licensee does not remove an authorized agent after the commissioner
issues and serves upon the licensee a final order including a finding that the
authorized agent has violated one or more provisions of this Chapter.
B. In determining whether a licensee is engaging in an unsafe or unsound
practice, the commissioner may consider the size and condition of the licensee's
money transmission, the magnitude of the loss, the gravity of the violation of this
Chapter, and the previous conduct of the person involved.
§1064. Violations
A. The office may implement an enforcement action against a licensee or
person who is not a licensee but is engaging in money transmission activities with,
or on behalf of, a resident in any of the following instances:
(1) The licensee or person violates any of the provisions of this Chapter or
any rule or regulation promulgated or any order, including but not limited to a cease
and desist order or subpoena, issued pursuant to this Chapter.
(2) The licensee or person violates any provision of a voluntary consent or
compliance agreement that has been entered into with the commissioner.
(3) The licensee or person, in the conduct of its money transmission
activities with, or on behalf of, a resident, engages in any of the following:
(a) An unsafe or unsound act or practice.
(b) An unfair or deceptive act or practice.
(c) Fraud or intentional misrepresentation.
(d) Any other dishonest act.
(e) Misappropriation of money, or its equivalent having monetary value, held
by a fiduciary.
(4) The licensee or person does not cooperate substantially with an
investigation by the office, fails to pay a fee, or fails to submit a report or
documentation.
(5) If any of the following occurs:
(a) The licensee or person becomes insolvent.
Page 51 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(b) The licensee or person makes a general assignment for the benefit of its
creditors.
(c) The licensee or person becomes the debtor, alleged debtor, respondent,
or person in a similar capacity in a case or other proceeding under any bankruptcy,
reorganization, arrangement, readjustment, insolvency, receivership, dissolution,
liquidation, or similar law and does not obtain from the court, within a reasonable
time, confirmation of a plan or dismissal of the case or proceeding.
(d) The licensee or person applies for, or permits the appointment of, a
receiver, trustee, or other agent of a court for itself or for a substantial part of its
assets.
(6) The licensee or person has knowingly provided or caused to be provided
a material misrepresentation to the commissioner, any false or fraudulent material
fact, or any false or fraudulent financial statement or has suppressed or withheld
from the commissioner any information which if submitted by the licensee would
have resulted in a denial of the license application.
(7) The licensee or person refuses to permit an examination by the
commissioner of the books and affairs or has refused or failed within a reasonable
time to furnish any information or make any report that may be required by the
commissioner pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter.
(8) The licensee or person fails to maintain records as required by the
commissioner after being given written notice to the last address of record and thirty
calendar days within which to correct the failure. The commissioner may grant up
to two thirty-calendar-day extensions within which to correct the recordkeeping
violation.
(9) The licensee or person who continues to have in office any individual
with power to direct the management or policies of a person regulated by this
Chapter including but not limited to any officer, director, or manager, if such
individual is convicted of, pleads guilty to, or is found guilty after a plea of nolo
contendere of any felony and has been adjudicated guilty in any state, federal,
foreign, or military court.
Page 52 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(10) The licensee or person violates any provision of a regulatory or
prohibitory statute of this state or any other state as determined by the government
agency responsible for citing such violations.
(11) The licensee or person misrepresents material facts or makes a false
promise likely to influence, persuade, or induce a resident to engage in money
transmission activities.
(12) The licensee or person misrepresents or conceals a material fact, term,
or condition of a transaction to which he is a party pertinent to a resident to engage
in money transmission activities.
(13) The licensee or person knowingly engages in any transaction, practice,
or course of business which perpetrates a fraud upon any person in connection with
engaging in money transmission activities.
(14) The licensee or person fails to sell, transfer, receive, or store, without
just cause, any funds in accordance with any agreement connected with a money
transmission transaction.
(15) The licensee or person fails to account for or deliver to any person any
assets obtained in connection with a money transmission activity transaction
including but not limited to money or its equivalent having monetary value.
(16) The licensee or person fails to pay any fee, civil money penalty, cost,
or assessment imposed pursuant to this Chapter or by any rule adopted or regulation
promulgated in accordance with this Chapter.
(17) The licensee or person violates the written restrictions or conditions
under which the license was issued.
(18) The licensee or person fails, after notice and without lawful excuse, to
obey any order or subpoena issued by the commissioner.
(19) The commissioner discovers any fact or condition that currently exists
that, if it had existed at the time of the original application for licensure, would have
warranted the denial of the application.
B.(1) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, and in addition to any
other authority conferred upon the commissioner by any other provision of law, the
Page 53 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
commissioner may, upon discovery, order an immediate suspension of the license
of any person licensed pursuant to this Chapter who does any of the following:
(a) Fails to meet the tangible net worth or fails to maintain the surety bond
requirements in any manner as provided for pursuant to R.S. 6:1059 or 1060.
(b) Commits a violation of any provision of this Chapter such that, in the
opinion of the commissioner, public safety and welfare demand that emergency
action be taken.
(c) Submits a payment of any fee for any application, notification,
examination, investigation, late fee, or penalty that is returned, declined, denied, or
otherwise not paid in full for any reason.
(d) Is convicted of a felony that would have prohibited the issuance or
renewal of the license.
(e) Has his license to engage in money transmission activities suspended or
revoked in another jurisdiction.
(2) A person whose license is suspended pursuant to this Subsection shall
have thirty calendar days from the date of the order to request a hearing in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. Failure to timely request a
hearing shall constitute a waiver of all hearing rights regarding the suspension.
C. In addition to any other authority conferred upon the commissioner by
this Chapter or this Title, the commissioner may issue a cease and desist order, order
refunds of any unauthorized portion of any fee, or charge any person who collects
in violation of this Chapter and may impose a civil money penalty as determined by
the commissioner by rule upon any person who is found to have violated any of the
provisions of this Chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated in accordance with
this Chapter. Each separate violation shall subject the person to a civil money
penalty, and each day the person acts without complying with the provisions of this
Chapter, or rules or regulations promulgated in accordance with this Chapter, shall
constitute a separate violation.
D. The violations listed in this Subsection are nonexclusive and are in
addition to and exist independent of any violations set forth in other provisions of
Page 54 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
this Chapter. Failure to comply with any provisions set forth in this Chapter may
serve as a basis for any enforcement or other action authorized to the commissioner
pursuant to this Title. It shall be a violation of this Chapter for a person engaged in
money transmission activities pursuant to this Chapter to do any of the following:
(1) Directly or indirectly employ any scheme, device, or artifice to defraud
or mislead any resident, when such person knew or should have known that such
scheme, device, or artifice was defrauding or misleading.
(2) Engage in any unfair or deceptive practice toward any resident.
(3) Fail to comply with this Chapter, any rules or regulations promulgated
pursuant to this Chapter, the laws of this state, or federal law, including the rules and
regulations issued thereunder, applicable to any money transmission activities.
(4) Negligently make any false statement, or knowingly and willfully make
any omission of material fact, in connection with any information or reports filed
with a state or federal government agency or the NMLS or in connection with any
investigation conducted by the commissioner or any other state or federal
government agency.
(5) Fail to truthfully account for any assets in connection with any money
transmission activities with, or on behalf of, a resident.
E. The commissioner may report apparent violations to other appropriate
state and federal regulators, the NMLS, federal law enforcement agencies, the
attorney general, or the district attorney of the appropriate parish, who may institute
any proceeding as he considers appropriate.
F. Advisory opinions and interpretations of the office shall not be considered
rules requiring compliance with the rulemaking process of the Administrative
Procedure Act. The commissioner and the employees of the office shall have no
liability to any person with respect to an advisory opinion or interpretation issued in
connection with this Chapter.
G. All of the grounds for enforcement action listed in Subsections A and D
of this Section are violations of this Chapter and may serve as the basis for any other
enforcement action provided to the commissioner by this Title.
Page 55 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
H. The commissioner may share information about any person who is
licensed or required to be licensed pursuant to this Chapter with any state or federal
agency also having jurisdiction over the money transmission activities of that person.
I.(1) Any licensee whose license was issued pursuant to this Chapter and has
been revoked for any reason may not reapply for a license until at least five years
have elapsed from the date of the order of revocation, unless the commissioner, in
his sole discretion, prescribes an earlier or later date.
(2) For purposes of this Subsection, the order is considered to be the
commissioner's notification of revocation of the license.
(3) For the purpose of this Subsection, the term "licensee" shall include the
licensee, owners of ten percent or more of the licensee, and its members if the
licensee is a limited liability company, its partners if the licensee is a partnership, its
officers and directors if the licensee is a corporation, and any other person
determined by the commissioner, in his sole discretion, to be closely related to the
licensee.
§1065. Authorized agents; suspend or revoke designation; grounds; relief
A. The commissioner may issue an order suspending or revoking the
designation of an authorized agent if the commissioner finds that any of the
following apply:
(1) The authorized agent violated any provision of this Chapter or a rule,
regulation, or order promulgated or issued pursuant to this Chapter.
(2) The authorized agent did not cooperate with an examination or
investigation by the commissioner.
(3) The authorized agent engaged in fraud, intentional misrepresentation, or
gross negligence.
(4) The authorized agent is convicted of a violation of a state or federal
anti-money-laundering statute.
(5) The competence, experience, character, or general fitness of the
authorized agent or a person in control of the authorized agent indicates that it is not
in the public interest to permit the authorized agent to provide money transmission.
Page 56 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(6) The authorized agent is engaging in an unsafe or unsound practice.
B. In determining whether an authorized agent is engaging in an unsafe or
unsound practice, the commissioner may consider the size and condition of the
authorized agent's provision of money transmission, the magnitude of the loss, the
gravity of the violation of this Chapter or a rule or regulation adopted and
promulgated or order issued in accordance with this Chapter, and the previous
conduct of the authorized agent.
C. An authorized agent may apply for relief from a suspension or revocation
of designation as an authorized agent according to procedures prescribed by the
commissioner.
§1066. Notice and license revocation hearing
A. A license shall not be revoked except on ten calendar days' notice, the
first day of the ten-day period to be the date stated on the notice, which shall be the
day it is mailed, to the licensee by the commissioner, sent by letter by United States
registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the licensee's business
address set forth in the application.
B. Upon receipt of the notice, as stated in the registered or certified mail
receipt, the licensee may, within five calendar days thereafter, which five-day period
may be wholly or partially outside of the ten-day period, make written demand for
a hearing by the office, which demand shall be accompanied by an additional surety
bond, the principal sum, or the market value thereof to be specified by the
commissioner in the revocation notice.
C. The revocation notice shall not become final during the period of time in
which the licensee may demand such hearing nor if licensee demands a hearing, until
the matter has been finally determined by the office or by the courts, provided that
the licensee first posts together with his written demand for hearing an additional
corporate surety bond, written by the same bonding or insurance company that wrote
the bond required pursuant to R.S. 6:1060 made by the licensee pursuant to R.S.
6:1060 which the additional surety bond shall be in a principal amount as specified
in the revocation order but not exceeding one million dollars. The bond shall secure
Page 57 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
the same obligations as does the corporate surety bond required by R.S. 6:1060 but
shall be in addition to the bond required thereby.
D. Upon receipt of the written demand, the commissioner shall thereafter,
with reasonable promptness, hear and determine the matter as provided by law or
regulation.
E. If the licensee deems himself aggrieved by the determination or order of
the commissioner, he may within thirty calendar days after the determination or
order have the determination or order reviewed by an appeal. All appeals shall be in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. The appeal shall be perfected
upon the posting of a bond for the costs of the appeal accompanied by the petition.
F. Final revocation of the license, whether automatic or by final
determination of the commissioner or the courts, shall cancel as of the date of final
revocation of all bonds theretofore furnished by the licensee in accordance with any
provision of this Section, provided that the licensee and his corporate surety shall not
be relieved of any accrued liabilities, until the commissioner determines that all
accrued liabilities, including but not limited to the principal sums thereof, accrued
interest thereon, and court costs, if any, assessed to the licensee, of the licensee
pursuant to this Section have been satisfied in full.
G. The commissioner may at any time revoke a license on any ground on
which he might refuse to grant a license, or for failure to pay an annual fee, or for
violation of any provision of this Section, and any such revocation shall be
implemented in accordance with the provisions of this Section.
H. A license shall be automatically and finally revoked without any act or
further act of the commissioner in the following instances:
(1) At expiration of the thirty-day notice period, if the corporate surety gives
notice of cancellation of its bond and failure by the licensee to furnish a replacement
corporate surety bond or any additional corporate surety bond required by the
commissioner pursuant to R.S. 6:1060.
Page 58 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
(2) Upon failure by the licensee to file when due, following proper notice
and a reasonable time period to correct the deficiency, any information required by
this Chapter.
(3) In case of a revocation notice pursuant to Subsection A of this Section,
failure by the licensee to demand a hearing as provided therein or failure to furnish
any additional corporate surety bond as required by the commissioner.
(4) Upon a license revocation order becoming final at any stage.
(5) Upon final conviction of the licensee as to any offense covered by this
Chapter.
I. If a revocation order becomes final for any reason or in any manner, the
license may not be reinstated, except upon new application as if the licensee had
never been licensed before. The commissioner may deny the new application on
grounds that a previous application was denied, a previous license to the applicant
was revoked, or any ground or grounds on which he may deny an original
application.
§1067. Order to cease and desist
A. If the commissioner determines that a violation of this Chapter or of a rule
or regulation adopted or an order issued relative thereto by a licensee or authorized
agent is likely to cause immediate and irreparable harm to the licensee, its customers,
or the public as a result of the violation, or cause insolvency or significant dissipation
of assets of the licensee, the commissioner may issue an order requiring the licensee
or authorized agent to cease and desist from the violation. The order becomes
effective upon service of it upon the licensee or authorized agent.
B. When the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe that a person is
violating any provision of this Chapter, the commissioner, in addition to and without
prejudice to the authority provided elsewhere in this Chapter, may sue in the
Nineteenth Judicial District Court of East Baton Rouge Parish to enjoin the person
from engaging in or continuing the violation or from doing any act in furtherance of
the violation. In such an action, the court may enter any order or judgment awarding
a preliminary or permanent injunction.
Page 59 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
C. An order to cease and desist remains effective until rescinded or released
by the commissioner or appealed as provided in this Section.
D. A licensee that is served with an order to cease and desist may petition
the Nineteenth Judicial District Court of East Baton Rouge Parish for a judicial order
setting aside, limiting, or suspending the enforcement, operation, or effectiveness of
the order.
§1068. Consent orders
The commissioner may enter into a consent order at any time with a person
to resolve a matter arising pursuant to this Chapter or a rule or regulation adopted or
order issued relative thereto. A consent order shall be signed by the person to whom
it is issued or by the person's authorized representative, and shall indicate agreement
with the terms contained in the order. A consent order may provide that it does not
constitute an admission by a person that this Chapter or a rule or regulation adopted
or an order issued relative thereto has been violated.
§1069. Criminal penalties
A. A person who intentionally makes a false statement, misrepresentation,
or false certification in a record filed or required to be maintained pursuant to this
Chapter or that intentionally makes a false entry or omits a material entry in such a
record is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than
five hundred dollars nor more than three thousand dollars, and may also be punished
by incarceration for a term not less than one year and not more than five years.
B. A person that knowingly engages in an activity for which a license is
required pursuant to this Chapter without being issued such a license and who
receives more than five hundred dollars in compensation within a thirty-day period
from this activity is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not
less than five hundred dollars nor more than three thousand dollars, and may also be
punished by incarceration for a term not less than one year and not more than five
years.
C. A person that knowingly engages in an activity for which a license is
required pursuant to this Chapter without being issued such a license and who
Page 60 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
receives no more than five hundred dollars in compensation within a thirty-day
period from this activity is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be
fined not less than one hundred dollars nor more than five hundred dollars and may
also be punished by incarceration for a term not more than one year.
§1070. Civil money penalties
The commissioner may assess a civil money penalty against a person that
violates any provision of this Chapter or a rule or regulation adopted or an order
issued relative thereto in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars per day for
each day the violation is outstanding, plus this state's costs and expenses for the
investigation and prosecution of the matter, including reasonable attorney's fees.
§1071. Unlicensed persons
A.(1) If the commissioner has reason to believe that a person has violated or
is violating the provisions of R.S. 6:1039, the commissioner may issue an order to
show cause why an order to cease and desist should not be issued requiring that the
person cease and desist from the violation of R.S. 6:1039.
(2) An order to cease and desist becomes effective upon service of it upon
the person.
(3) An order to cease and desist remains effective and enforceable until
rescinded or released by the commissioner or appealed as provided in this Section.
(4) A person that is served with an order to cease and desist for violating
R.S. 6:1039 may petition the Nineteenth Judicial District Court of East Baton Rouge
Parish for a judicial order setting aside, limiting, or suspending the enforcement,
operation, or effectiveness of the order.
B. In an emergency, the commissioner may petition the Nineteenth Judicial
District Court of East Baton Rouge Parish on an ex parte basis for the issuance of a
temporary restraining order pursuant to the Louisiana Code of Civil Procedure, and
such order, if issued, shall not require the posting of a bond on behalf of the state.
§1072. Investigation of possible violations
In addition to and without prejudice to the authority provided elsewhere in
this Title, the commissioner, or his duly authorized representative, for the purpose
Page 61 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
of discovering violations of this Chapter and for the purpose of determining whether
persons are subject to the provisions of this Chapter, may examine persons licensed
pursuant to this Chapter and persons reasonably suspected by the commissioner of
conducting business that requires a license pursuant to this Chapter, including all
relevant books, records, and papers employed by those persons in the transaction of
their business, and may summon witnesses and examine them under oath concerning
matters relating to the business of those persons, or such other matters as may be
relevant to the discovery of violations of this Chapter, including without limitation
the conduct of business without a license as required pursuant to this Chapter.
Section 3.(A) A person licensed in this state to engage in the business of money
transmission shall not be subject to the provisions of this Act, to the extent that they conflict
with or establish new requirements not imposed under law as it existed immediately prior
to the effective date of this Act, until such time as the licensee renews its current license or
for twelve months after the effective date of this Act, whichever is later.
(B) Notwithstanding Subsection (A) of this Section, a licensee shall only be required
to amend its authorized agent contracts for contracts entered into or amended after the
effective date or the completion of any transition period set forth in Subsection (A) of this
Section. Nothing herein shall be construed as limiting an authorized agent's obligations to
operate in full compliance with this Act as required by R.S. 6:1054(D).
Section 4. In applying and construing the provisions of the Chapter established in
this Act, consideration may be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with
respect to its subject matter among states.
Section 5. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof is held invalid, such
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this Act which can be given
effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this
Act are hereby declared severable.
Section 6. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
recodify the provisions of Title 6, Chapter 13, to designate the newly enacted Sections as
memorialized in Section 2 of this Act, with any non-substantive, technical changes that may
be necessary.
Page 62 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1230 ENROLLED
Section 7. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby directed to change all
references from "Sales of Checks and Money Transmission Act" to "Louisiana Money
Transmission Act" throughout the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
Section 8. This Act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 63 of 63
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.